nl: Compatibiliteit hockeystickformaat: Keeper; Gemiddeld; Junior; Senior; Universeel; Jeugd; Overig
cs: Kompatibilita velikosti hole: Brankářská; Intermediate (závodní); Junior; Senior; Univerzální; Dětská; Jiné
zh-TW: 棒狀尺寸相容性: 守門員; 中級; 青少年; 成人; 通用; 兒童; 其他
it: Compatibilità delle dimensioni del bastoncino: Portiere; Intermedio; Junior; Senior; Universale; Ragazzi; Altro
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do tamanho do stick: Guarda-redes; Intermédio; Júnior; Sénior; Universal; Jovem; Outro
ja: スティックサイズ対応性: ゴーリー; インターメディエイト; ジュニア; シニア; ユニバーサル; ユース; その他
nb: Kompatibilitet for køllestørrelse: Målvakt; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Universell; Ungdom; Annet
hu: Bot méret kompatibilitása: Kapus; Középhaladó; Junior; Szenior; Univerzális; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
el: Συμβατότητα μεγέθους ραβδιού: Τερματοφύλακας; Μεσαίο; Junior; Senior; Γενικής χρήσης; Παιδικό; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilność rozmiaru kija: Bramkarski; Średnio zaawansowany; Juniorski; Seniorski; Uniwersalny; Młodzieżowy; Inny
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličine palice: Vratar; Srednja razina; Za juniore; Za seniore; Univerzalno; Za mlade; Ostalo
fr: Compatibilité des tailles de bâtons: Gardien de but; Intermédiaire; Junior; Senior; Universel; Jeune; Autre
vi: Độ tương thích về kích thước gậy: Thủ môn; Trung gian; Thiếu niên; Người lớn; Phổ thông; Nhi đồng; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilita veľkosti palice: Brankár; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Univerzálna; Žiak; Iné
da: Størrelseskompatibilitet for stav: Målmand; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Universel; Ungdom; Andet
fi: Mailan koon yhteensopivuus: Maalivahti; Intermediate; Juniori; Seniori; Universaali; Nuoret; Muu
ko: 스틱 크기 호환성: 골리; 인터미디어트; 주니어; 시니어; 범용; 유스; 기타
en: Stick size compatibility: Goalie; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Universal; Youth; Other
de: Kompatible Größe für den Schläger: Torwart; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Universal; Jugend; Andere
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu mărimea crosei: Portar; Intermediari; Juniori; Seniori; Universal; Tineret; Altele
tr: Çubuk boyut uyumluluğu: Kaleci; Orta seviye; Junior; Yetişkin; Evrensel; Genç; Diğer
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของขนาดไม้ฮอกกี้: ผู้รักษาประตู; ระดับกลาง; รุ่นจูเนียร์; รุ่นซีเนียร์; อเนกประสงค์; วัยรุ่น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de dimensões do bastão: Goleiro; Intermediário; Júnior; Sênior; Universal; Juvenil; Outro
lt-LT: Lazdos dydžio suderinamumas: Vartininkų; Tarpinis; Jaunių; Suaugusiųjų; Universalus; Jaunimo; Kita
es: Compatibilidad de tamaño del bastón: Portero; Intermedio; Junior; Senior; Universal; Juvenil; Otro
sl-SI: Združljivost velikosti palice: Vratar; Intermediate; Mladinsko; Člansko; Univerzalno; Otroško; Drugo
zh-CN: 球杆尺寸兼容性: 守门员; 中级; 青少年级; 成人级; 通用; 儿童级; 其他
ru: Совместимость размера палочки: Вратарская; Переходная; Юниорская; Взрослая; Универсальная; Детская; Другое
sv: Kompatibilitet med pinnstorlek: Målvakt; Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Universal; Ungdom; Övrigt
bg-BG: Съвместимост с размер на стика: Вратар; Междинен; Юношески; За възрастни; Универсален; Младежки; Друго